Apple 16GB iPad Mini with Wi-Fi@@@nothing new to say about it it is an apple product and stands out of crowd as usual. was delivered by flipkart in lightening speed and as usual great packaging
I am enjoying iPad mini , I bought few days back. I like its sleek design and multitasking ability without any lag. Only one concern I had is that while browsing net , font size of the content of web pages are very tiny and I could not find any permanent solution for that even after doing lot of search on google.
Great product from Apple, I opted Apple product very first time and its been a great experience. iPad Mini is exceptionally built in terms of quality,performance,user friendly and touch is superb. I have been using this product from 1 month and i must say there is no lag in zoom in/out of the screen. Overall strongly recommend this product for all who gaming, watching movies and surfing (it actually made me a minimal user of laptop). Thanks FK for providing in an exchange Offer. Apple really focusing on customer needs and now Apple should think budget phones in India
I purchased several gift items on flipkart over last 6 months and i had a great experience. This is not someone from flipkart writing this review and really i am feeling great experience and thought of sharing for other online users outside India. Only issue is they are unable to reach interior locations and i am sure they will expand their shipping reach to smaller cities and towns. All the best Flipkart.
Own both - samsung Tab and iPad - iPad wins on all front. I bought it in a exchange offer and got it for 15K which I think is a great price for a product of such quality. The best part about any apple product is the ecosystem... Flipkart delivered as promised and happy about the overall experience.
Brought it a month ago!, Very prompt & fast deliver by Flipkart.. I am loving my iPad mini and have NO issues with anything except that the camera looks bit weird in night, i.e., looks like DOTS, just not sure if this is how the iPad mini 5MP cam is.. Awesome product!..
Easy to carry around and value for money though Expensive compared to other tablets in the market. However it all depends upon one's perception as myself being an apple user for past 15 years I continue to buy apple products. Ipad min wifi is a great model to have as one can hold it comfortable with a hand or use it while being mobile for is small size and many features. These days everyplace being a wifi hotspot, 3G is not missed much. Only issue still pending is the 50 percent offer on ipad accessories which came along with this purchase has not been provided by the Seller for reasons well known to him.
magnificent tablet computer. though it required a credit card to download from app store, i sneaked a way through otherwise. pros: 1.sleek n sexy: 2. brilliant display: 3. seamless performance: cons: notification panel doesn't give as much control as in android tablets. looks like it's just made for people who have many appointments to handle.
This machine packs a killer punch. Overall the experience with the product is satisfying. Though I hardly get to spend my time on the iPad, but whenever I check my mails or watch videos or listen songs on my iPad, its hassle-free !
I have never been an ios fan. But that is because everything is paid in the framework. But the moment you pay and get a decent app you will understand what a wonderful device it is. First of all, let me explain my purpose. I have purchased it and replaced it with my Galaxy Note. i need to scribble a lot and i am really bad with papers. So galaxy note was a boon for me. But the processor used to give up and battery was an issue. So, i picked up a moto g and exchanged my note with ipad mini. i got a adonit stylus and few paid apps. The device works like a charm. infact better than note for scribbling. The os is pretty stable and the power backup is mind boggling. I used it for 7 days for office work and taking notes and it is still on 75%. A good alternative to your diary and a laptop and its extremely light to carry.
This is iPad. There's not much that can go wrong with it. I love this product. Since my iPhone has retina display on it, the display on this iPad might feel inferior at times. Retina or not, when it comes to video streaming, it looks far better than any other display i have ever seen. This one is compatible with iOS 7, so you are not missing out much on the latest offerings from app store. Thanks to flipkart's irresistible exchange offers, I bought this on replacing my 3 year old laptop, and as expected my usage is far more than what i was doing with the laptop. Flipkart delivery was better on this one. The product was delivered in 2 days - that is 3 days earlier than quoted.
Apple products are probably meant for those who just want their product to work, the way it has been conceived to work, and for those absolutely unperturbed by the overwhelming restrictions imposed by the OS. There is no doubt it is a great product, especially if one has not had the android experience. It is great for reading pdf files, browsing the web, and so on. Battery life is amazing, especially on standby. There is no microsd expansion slot. If you are used to a file system. as in Windows desktop PCs and in Android Phones, you won't find one here. And a file goes in either through a trusted computer or through the net, and is basically transferred to the care of a specific application. Bluetooth is rudimentary, and is meant only to connect headphones and stuff, and the concept of wifi-direct is non existent. There is no smooth way to transfer files from your android smartphone to the ipad, except by using cloud based software. If you must, buy it for its sheer beauty, and snob value. But if the ability to tweak and modify, and flexibility are desired, go for a high end android tablet.
Its been 5 days since I placed the order and this product hasn't yet received at the nearest hub. terrible delay in delivery and I've no reasons to buy future products from Flipkart
Excellent product for daily use. I hate the iphone but there is no competition to Ipads yet, Google is yet to catchup. And thanks to Flipkart for giving me such a nice deal
Best product, I suggest, don't research just go for it. It's far better than any other product. It's pinch bit while buying because of cost is little high. but it's value for money. 5 star
Obviously it is one of the most beautiful thing ever created by Apple!!! 1) Looks it Superb, Thinner and lighter great design. If your are an apple lover go for it. Shitty thing is it ain't come with an Headphones. Thanks to Flipkart for there Great Service delivered within 2 days.
One of the best tablet available in market. Every feature is upto the mark and I will recommend any one who wants to have tablet ....
Don't even think about anything else. Absolutely the best tab money can buy. Just wish the screen was a tad better.
The product is good at all aspects. Some of the cons are Poor WiFi connectivity and less sensitive touch than Samsung. Pros: Light weight, Slim Design, Nice Camera.
As I paid for One day delivery i received next day of my purchase. Flipkart's delivery time is always good. It has everything one would need... :) It works like charm.. I bought 16GB model and still 8.5GB is free.. I use it for daily tasks like.. Surfing, email, music, reading eBooks.Games. It is fast and works perfect to fulfill your needs. Sometimes i use it to test website's responsiveness. Design is also nice and sleek.. Best Quality.. Its is updated to Latest 7.1 iOS still works fast.. and last but not the least.. it is Value for Money... Got it in just Rs.16900
undoubtedly the best tab. it pulls off incredible performance with not so high specifications. iOS7 is icing on the cake.to me its the real tab with pleasing appearance. easy to hold and does what its supposed to do. I don't expect it to slow down in performance even after couple of years because that's Apple for you. You may be enticed with android laden slates, i would suggest not to go for android when it comes to tab.
I'm very much delighted and pleased that I choose flipkart for my most of online purchases. Excellent delivery timelines. Good quality products and decently priced. For any first time internet buyer, I would suggest to go for Flipkart as it will make your shopping experience extremely happy and contented one... Thanks Hemant
Hi I bought this product just 4 days back. I am spending lots of time with applle mini , I do a mistake that i bought the product without 3g. but apple mini is grate so... if you buy without 3g again you have to buy a wifi router....
Got this yesterday (26th Mar) @17.5k with screen guard (16GB with only Wi-Fi white color) in a retail shop with no exchange offer. The first impressions are good except that it requires some time to get used to it. Overall it appears to be worth at this price.
I don't know why people buy this device . Got 7000/- rs off :) .and still i don't have any idea what i should do with this
I am really satisfied with the delivery of flipkart.and the product is really good . I am enjoying it !!
Flipkart's delivery is wonderful. I like the way you guys update the status against the order. Its simply superb and something that we expect many to do in India. As far as Apple IPM is considered....need do I comment about this product? Its stunning...a beautiful experience. I like this better than the bigger version. This one is handy and very easy to use. I just like IPM!!
THe product is nice. I got what I expected. Features are good, and do gives the apple feel, though it would have been better, if camera was a little more good.
A Great product from Apple factory,No other Tablet could compete wihth Apple I pad Mini in terms of Build Quality,Unlimited Apps that are growing day By day,A Great product worth Buy.Very Quick delivery (2 days Delivery at Doorstep)from Flipkart with Good packing,Flipkart should also offer Applae I pad Mini Cover case Bundled with it.
I bought this ipad after a lot of consideration to add up to my existing apple chain of products that I already have. First of all great deal for exchange of any gadget by FlipKart. I intentionally bought the wifi model. Reason today we all live in the world of wifi whether in your home, hotspots, hotels , institutions, ( the list will go on & on) and now in airlines (some of them). India still needs to improve their 3g service & cost and LTE of course is way out of reach as of now in India where the ISPs are still lacking in infrastructure. Buying a cellular ipad in India in my opinion is a waste of money. One can save a lot and use that amount for other necessary accessories. Having the 128Gb Cellular model already, this 16Gb model is perfect for your daily use viz emails, messages, a bit of music & videos and browsing. With the latest IOS 7.1.4 the ipad Mini is fast and accurate with many new features. One does not miss out the retina display and the new A7 chip much unless you are a gamer or a hard core developer or an IT enthusiast involved into multitasking with various apps. The weight and thinness is excellent besides the size as it can be held by one hand with ease. The white iPad gives the royal touch of the apple Brand , of course opinions differ. Great Deal for sure that I am attracted to go for another exchange of my old Macbook too. However, Flipkart's seller WS Retail failed by not providing the 50 percent on ipad accessories offer. They advertised about it on the description page during the product sale and I am still following up with them. Lets see what happens.
Good product. Good price 17,700. Go for it No point going for retina display version Flipkart delivery was also on time
Got this cheaper than any other local market. 18.5K for a grey-black is just worth! I thought that the seller would be dumping the old pieces at this discounted price,but the iPad I received was packed in Jan 2014 or so...Again fine services by flipkart, kudos.
I exchanged my heavily worn but functional iPad 2, and I'm really satisfied with the iPad Mini I got in return for around 12k. I know most of the specs are the same, except for the camera (better on Mini) and battery capacity (bigger on iPad 2). However, I really needed to replace my old iPad without spending too much money, and the compact size of the Mini is perfect. Plus the processing speed on the Mini 1 is more than enough for the apps I mainly run i.e. reading eBooks, recording music , streaming online media. So spending significantly more money on the Mini 2 wasn't necessary in my opinion.
"The seven-inch tablets are tweeners: too big to compete with a smartphone, and too small to compete with an iPad." A well said quote by Steve Jobs. Well the best you can get is an Apple Ipad Mini... best in quality, best for money, best for status, best for time saving. a must buy product by Apple...
A product worth buying and with the exchange offer it is superb. I was waiting to have a good tablet as the previous one was a micromax tab and I was not happy with that from the first day. When I got this opportunity grabbed ti and I am happy I made the right decision. The clarity is not like ipad air or mini 2 but I am happy with it and I did not face any lag in the few games that I play as mosltly I read books and wtch movies while on the go. So the things are working fine for me.
I have an iPad 4 and and iPad 2, but I feel that the iPad mini is the easiest to hold and use. It is small yet powerful. With the great exchange offer going on, everyone should get one.
little disappointed with features..and use of it.. only wireless is another disadvantafe og it.. not able to use much
Thanks to Flipkart for bringing out such good exchange schemes. Now I am busy with the new Apple ipad mini. As promised by flipkart the product was well packed and a fresh piece delivered safe and sound by flipkart. Hope to see more such exchange scheme for other house hold articles also.
I am writing this review on my I pad mini it is a very nice product if you are thinking to buy it just don't think , buy it.".....................
Aswas we know apple is best all time. Flipkart is great seecvixe provder. Excelent seevice in delivey and exchagr with old devices. All the best and please ensure same level of service to everyone
I had availed of the 16gb ipad mini under the exchange offer and got Rs.7000 off for my old HP laptop. The exchange process was extremely transparent and speedy. I received the ipad in 3 days and at the same time handed over my old laptop to the delivery guy. The ipad is working superbly well with no hang ups. In fact it's so handy that I can't even leave home without it now! Kudos to flipkart once again.
I never had a liking for Apple products as they are very restrictive in terms of file sharing etc.. but then I must say that Apple has done a great job, though the RAM is low in comparison to other tabs they have managed to squeeze every ounce of the 512 MB the mini has. The feel of the device is great and what more you want when such a device is clubbed with excellent offers from Flipkart. Had a Blackberry Playbook which i had to sell and the exchange offer for Ipad mini took care of it.. I got a cool Rs.7000 off in exchange of the 3 year old Playbook, plus a 50% off for the iPad cover which was activated after the delivery of iPad.
U can buy iPad mini without hesitation if ur purpose is only for browsing, gaming, and for reading books or files..got it today in exchange offer for ? 14900.. Just fits in ur hand.. Design is superb..light weight..fast access...and am loving dis..thank you flipkart..I exchanged dis wid my laptop which am not using over an year..cheers..
recent read two articles Sony is worst in retaining its customer Apple Inc is number 1 in retaining iPad Pros Best Battery backup Apps resumes from where u stopped good display Alternate to a computer ... cons limited memory wifi dependent, thus indoor device (suggest to buy cellular)
I ordered this product. The courier person from Flipkart came to deliver the product today, I was not carrying the gadget which had to exchanged. I requested the courier person to deliver the product tomorrow since i did not have the exchange gadget. At 12am I receive a message from Flipkart stating that my order has been cancelled. I wonder how did my order get cancelled. Please you need to improve your delivery services as it is an inconvenience. I have been asked to re-order the product,but the gadget details are not accepted by Flipkart stating that it has already been used. Kindly look into this matter at the earliest, as I have started to lose faith in your site. I will review the product if Flipkart sends it to me to buy. Highly disappointed.
I have been using ipad mini for the last 1 year and have again bought a new one after giving my old one to my cousin. I have used galaxy tab and i would say, its nowhere near the smoothness offered by ipad mini.
I recently purchased this product in Feb 2014 and i must tell u, that this product is value for money.
Apple products are known to be very reliable. And iPad Mini was no exception. Though they are a bit expensive, but buying under exchange offer made it worthwhile.
one dont ve to say anything abt apple, simple amazing product smart and sexy product to hold in hand, totally worth buying,. better that my old tab 3 from samsung
I dont have any thing to tell about the product when it is APPLE... About Flipkart.. They are good and perfect in delivery and package.. I got this product as an exchange for my tab.. My dream about getting an apple product has come true with Flipkart. Thanks.
Received iPad mini with iOS 7.0.4, the look and the feel of the iPad mini stuns you! Recently updated with iOS 7.1 the performance has improved a lot & app runs without any slags except real racing 3 offering few frames may be around 15fps. The display is sported with 1024x763 with 163 ppi, the letters looks clear & the screen looks bright, it's true with the statement " every inch is an iPad " the contents on the screen looks great & browsing web is amazing.. The texts are legible without zooming in Great multitasking without draining battery & overall the solid feel makes you that you have never gone wrong with iPad mini whether it comes to gaming or business..:)
The price point of Rs. 13500 after 10% cashback on axis bank & exchange of my laptop was the attraction. Flipkart service was awesome. Not sure why WS retail does not deliver in UP. Had to get help from my friend in Haryana. Regarding the product, the biggest negative is low ppi count. Reading magazines and books on my Note-2 is much better. If I had a higher budget, maybe any of the Ipads with retina display would have helped in my purpose of reading. I would not repeat other negatives and positives which have been highlighted in numerous reviews.
Service of Flipkart in packing, and delivery is excellent with the official prepared to deliver on Sunday too! However, I am not impressed with the product with the high pitch marketing propaganda of the product, which does not tell the same about the product. Except for the fine and exceptionally better finish, I do find any other exceptional features, having tried other tab and mobiles. It does not have voice calling facility, no external storage through micro card, ear phones are not provided and for change of credit card in the apple id, for purchase, they charge you. Overall, apple fleeces the owner of the money for superficial products which have no creative, but only show off value. Initially the product was giving me problem with the Ipad not responding at all. I have to wait till the battery is exhausted for recharge and further use. To-day Apple had confirmed the problem with the unresponsive screen and given updation of the software.
Got an amazing deal on the exchange for my old (not being used) smartphone. It was just lying in my cupboard and now it's an iPad Mini, haha. I don't think there's something about Apple's iPad Mini that i have to add that millions before me haven't said, it's an amazing product.
An ipad is an ipad..Excellent packing to keep the product intact and delivery was well before time. Would be waiting for more deals.
got this for 15000 in the exchange offer. Great tablet for the price !! completely satisfied with the product
My first purchase on Flipkart! Really impressive work. On time delivery with awesome Logistics. Ipad Mini looks brilliant. Exceeds my expectations. Apple can never disappoint its customers so is Flipkart.
Ok now I will be very honest in my review. I have been a android lover for the past many years. I hated apple because of its limitations. In December I bought the google nexus from Flipkart and enjoyed the experience just for two months after which it started hanging and just wudnt boot up. I lost all my trust on android. The iPad is in a league of its own. Forget ram or ghz it doesn't matter wth this beauty. Everything is super smooth and made for the iPad unlike android tablets where the apps r common with mobile phones. The entire experience of using this tab is mind blowing. And now even more value because of some apps r available free like keynote, numbers, iPhoto garage band. This is a tab that u can use for work or play. Yes it's expensive but use the exchange offer to its fullest. That's what I have done ! If you have the money for the retina go for it otherwise the mini is just fine as it is. This will definitely change the way you do things and wil make stuff all the easier and fun. The apps are actually made for the iPad mini. It's got a mix for everyone. Hope you enjoy the iPad just like how I'm enjoying every bit of it. Thx Flipkart for making this exchange possible and getting this product to me on time.
It has very good display and it seems you are having a retina display. There is no possibility to compare with the Nexus 7 as nexus 7 has poor display quality and worse and i have exchanged my nexus 7 for iPad mini on Flipkart's exchange offer. It sounds excellent and drive more happy for me to shop on Flipkart. Flipkart changes men's life style really. Thank you so much Flipkart for your rocking services.
No introduction required. Very good Tablet. Bought it under exchange of my old mobile, at 13000. If exchange was not there, would have got iPad Mini with retina display. iOS 7 works really good. Flipkart delivered within 2 Days.
I don't know what i have to mention as Flipcart is the highest cheater seller as somebody who is not good with its ethics & want to be successful in overnight I bought IPad mini with the exchange offer on an event of Steve jobs B'day to replace my Nokia E-63 smartphone & made the payment but they have cancelled my order without informing me & never returned me back my money so beware while buying anything from cheater Flipcart
It is so convenient to buy and iPad sitting at home without any tension, and delivery also done in a few days.. thumbs up..!!
Excellent Genuine and Prompt Services. Before time 100 % Genuine products. Always Enjoyable to buy from this site.
Nice cute iPad. Small,efficient and brilliant as well. Got this product yesterday and I am loving it as always like my old iPad. Infact, it is more versatile. Touch is smooth, OS is excellent. Only one thing I found a bit let down, back case is a bit fingerprint magnet !
Handy. You can carry it along with you. Performance is best. Never runs out of battery very soon. I left it on standby for almost 3 days. I thought i had switched it off. But the battery power stayed where it was. PDF reader comes along with the package and is good. Never slows down or hangs. Smooth transition from screen to screen. But no manual with the package. So may take time to learn the operation.
Hi, I have bought Ipad some time back and I am absolutely happy with this, the only problem I face is its 16 GB, I don't use it for much gaming except to read books, check mail's, browse using wifi-hotspot in my android, perfect compact little companion at 17000/- You have to install ibook from apple store to and use itunes to sync your books. With most of the time spend reading books and wifi switched on in parallel it gives me backup of around 7 days.
Funny that this outdated product is still selling. not even 200ppi screen. People will laugh if you use such an old technology in public. Plus it strains your eyes because of the bad screen. It is even selling above rs10,000 Really Funny. Had it not been gifted I would have never thought apple made such low grade products too. Update also slowed this down.
I was initially impressed with flipkart on seeing this offer, i became curious and planned to buy..But looks like this model is available on other sites at approx. same price...then why do i have to give my old smartphone, laptop or tab in exchange...Flipkart seems no long pocket friendly...
As always an Apple product has made me happy. This is my 5th Apple product and don't regret buying it. Excellent features, non-retina display actually does not make a huge difference since this is a 7.9 inch screen unless you are pixel peeping. I purchased this for my mom, who is a senior citizen and hope she will come out of her "techno-phobia" and use it. The FK exchange offer makes this a even more sweet deal. FK delivered within 60 Hours of placing order and the entire process was smooth.
Nothing much to say abt ipad..... its quite a good one....Flipkart made it much easier to order! Wish there are more offers while buying!!!
It is a very good product and I enjoy using it. Since I am already using iPhone, using iPad was just a breeze!
The iPad Mini shipped with iOS 6.0 and updated with iOS 7. The screen is much sharper and brighter - it's one of the best tablet screens around. Value for money But this offer came from APPLE so nothing much for flipkart and the seller... But seriously should look into your shipping system... Apart from shipping it's a very smooth deal.. Like to do more shopping with Flipkart!!! Thanks to APPLE!!
i love the performance.. and specialy battery backup single charge i can use 2-3 days surfing and listining musics.... but 16gb is very low for me
iPad mini has terrible resolution when reading, bought the new Nook HD+ and the resolution is GREAT! 100% Recommended.
Before I start, I would like to identify myself as an Android Fanboy. That being said, this is my first iDevice(unless you consider iPod Shuffle as one, in which case, this is my second). To put it simply, mind = blown when I started using this today. The feel of the iPad, the OS, everything exudes excellence and perfection. And to think that this only has the half the power of a Nexus 7(2012) on the paper, yet performs loads better than that, is really impressive. I exchanged my Nexus 7(2012) for this and it's a great deal IMHO.
There s clearly no comparison of iOS with open source OS s. Honestly speaking this apple device is really wonderful every aspect of the build is so clean and perfect that it feels even the very website I open is also built to fit the screen. The size is decent and easily fits in one hand. Easily sync device across wifi with multiple apple devices or with PC. Siri is not just accurate and intelligent but also witty. No hesitation in providing features to the device the OS updates, apps support etc. Battery almost lasts for 5 days at the rate 2 -3 hr usage per day. A lot of features others are yet to imagine or probably implement in their next release. Nothing to lose in the non retina model except a slight reduced sharpness which results in lack of sharp defined edges of text, graphic. A7 chip might not be a big loss for regular usage conditions like reading, browsing. Features: No ads on apps, no fat and cheap plastic body, no malware, spyware etc plaguing in App Store or device, no app killers, boosters, Horlicks etc No false promises on free services.No 1000 google apps pre installed and gulping half memory. None forcing you to sign in/up for specific account. No hangs leading to brutally crack back cover and popping battery. No stretched apps from phone all apps are built again for iPad taking advantage of big screen. Direct device replacement on finding an acceptable defect in product. The built quality is superior and metallic. Even a ?5000 apple book case is worth to protect this precious product. Now don't tell me I ll get a tablet for ?5000 go get an apple iPad .......
I purchased this product from a local dealer. It shut down after five days. I returned the product and got a new one. The same thing hapened, It just went blank. APLLE IS THE WORST COMPANY IN THE WORLD. After a week i got a Nexus 7. It is the best tablet and the android experience is awesome. Apple Ipad does not come even halfway of Nexus 7. DO NOT BUY APPLE PRODUCTS> THEY ARE FOOLING INDIAN CUSTOMERS BY OVERPRICING Never Buy Apple Products. The OS is horrible, Bluetooth works only with apple devices, Useless apps on AppStore. Buy Android tablets and you will never be sorry. APPLE CANNOT WORK IN INDIA APPLE SUCKS!!!
I am a fan of Apple products, thus the buy. My children use this product so you can understand this it is rough usage, and the product is very good. I feel I invested in a good product. Service of Flipkart - The product was delivered before delivery date.
i love the Ipad mini. I dithered for some time before buying it as I was not sure I could cope without a keyboard (but its amazing how fast you adapt). The only major downside is the charging cable. It is so rediculously short I have to place my ipad on the floor to charge it. I would have expected a lead that was long enough to enable you to place it safely on a table. I have purchased some longer leads but they have all stopped working after a couple of days. Has anyone else had this problem
Bought this on EMI a few days back for gifting to the wife. Excellent product, though i'm yet to find proper use for it apart from the novelty factor. Smooth screen performance, as expected from apple.
Thank you Flipkart for fast & perfect delivery. Product is excellent, I am very happy with the performance but it would be good if Apple provides atleast a cloth to clean the screen, if nor screen guard
One of the best online products i have purchased. Amazing delivery and product, i liked the Ipad Mini. Great product.
I have purchased last oct 13 and using it rough and tough. Battery life is amazing. Never hang till date. Running more than 20 application at a time but no problem observed. Very happy to use. Only resolution is slightly disappointed.
Well even if flipkart says that its currently running ios6. Its not. The seller shipped me the device stock with ios7. I dont hate ios7.But it sure is sluggish on older devices like this ipad mini. Applications seem to close more often on this ipad mini than it does on the newer device apple has released this year. Also ios7 is not completely baked yet. It doesnt have the same amount of detail which ios6 has been developed with over the years.. I am however willing to pass apple on this as they had just a year to develop ios 7 from groundup. I hope ios8 will work with the extraordinary detail that its known for.I bought this for my mother.She loves it. Using it for: Web Surfing. Facebook. Downloading Songs and movies. Downloading recipes Saving Recipes Reminders Music. And the iPad works perfectly for her, as she is not tech savvy as i am.:P
I've used almost all platforms like Android,Blackberry,Windows ...etc.I found some flaws in all the before mentioned platforms.Especially there was a huge lag in android while using particular apps. Where as in the scenario of iOS. It's absolutely stunning....I should truly thank Steve Jobs beyond words..Take my bow !!
I am using iPad mini 16 GB Wi-Fi only model from past 11 months (since Feb 2013). I assume I can give a proper feedback on the product. Delivery from flipkart was as always good, well packed, received on the 2nd day. Product Review - Hardware =========================== 1. As always Apple has built this product keeping user experience as their top priority. 2. Premium build. No other tablet comes even closer to this in terms of build quality (Not even iPad 4, except iPad Air which was launched recently. iPad Air is similar in build to iPad mini). 3. Lightning port is awesome. Its small and faster than the previous ones. 4. 5 MP camera is more than sufficient for a tablet (I guess very very very few people would like to take photos with their tablets). Front camera is also good for video chat. 5. All physical buttons gives good tactile feedback and it won't breakdown after regular use. It will for sure lasts for its lifetime (Except Home button - Please see Useful tips and Apps section below in my review for workaround). 6. Battery is very good. Even after using for close to a year, it is giving me 10 Hrs of back-up. I can easily watch 3 full length English movies easily plus can do few other tasks. 7. Touch sensitivity, I guess no words required. No one can match Apple products on this. Product Review - Software =========================== 1. Apple products always don't have top of the line processors/ RAM available in the market (I mean lot of other tablets might have Quad-core processor and 2 GB of RAM). But They exactly know how to get maximum out of the box. 2. As always Hardware and Software made to work together by Apple. 3. All apps run smoothly without any issues. 4. This came with iOS6 and I've upgraded to iOS7 and this brought in a lot of new features like control centre, new notification centre, viewing/ switching b/w recently used apps etc. Its really good. 5. Compared to Android this is a matured app ecosystem (I liked the Android's Google Play store interface though). You will find less number of bugs/ blind apps. All the apps are always updated quickely to new releases. Few Useful tips and good app suggestion ======================================== 1. Constant use of home button will definitely cause an issue after 1 year or one and a half year. You can address this issue by enabling assistive touch. This acts like a home button plus lot more with iOS7. 2. Few apps which I would suggests are (this is my personal opinion and I am not mentioning games) a. Pocket (To read contents offline) b. NDTV c. Snapseed (photo editing) d. Adobe Reader e. iBooks f. VLC (I guess no need to explain about this :P) g. ESPN Cricinfo h. facebook, gmail and twitter (The usual suspects) i. Chrome j. Google maps Concerns =========== There are not many. But a few 1. Photos and videos look great, there is no doubt about that. But given the pricing, they should have provided Retina display. 2. All the stuff needs to be transferred via iTunes. Some ways this is good since when you are using on a new computer you need to authorize it and some ways it is bad (especially for people who often format their PCs and install fresh copies of Windows). You need to keep a copy of back-up always. 3. Using iTunes is difficult for those who are new to Apple products. This is really not user friendly unless you are very familiar with it. Also transferring via iTunes is time consuming. 4. No memory card slot, means no expansion (like any other Apple products). One good thing about Apple products is that you are guaranteed with regular software upgrades/ updates. You can at least have 2 to 3 OS upgrades (In android you will hardly get OS upgrade, unless you buy their flagship product and even for those you will get only 1 upgrade). Having said that I would highly recommend this product and if you are frequent traveller and want to use internet on the move, you can go for Cellular + Wi-Fi model (Which is little expensive). I would give 8.5/10 for this product.
Worth spending on iPad mini.Amazing screen quality and excellent battery life.And as always,flipart is at its best on delivering.
Apple hardware cannot be beaten in terms of quality and robustness. But there is nothing to do on an iPad for a techno geek if the device is not jailbroken. Thankfully the jailbreak for iOS 7.0 to 7.0.4 is out now and so it's again become a useful device, the only problem being jailbreak probably voids the warranty. Without a jailbreak, iPads are nowhere close to Samsung Tablets and other Android ones in terms of functionality offered. Moreover, till the time Apple incorporates voice calling feature into iPads, they would remain second-fiddle to Samsung in the middle class segment. And lastly, the price for this model is supposedly dropped to around 16k on January 20, 2014. Don't know when it's getting updated here.
The timing and the delivery of the product was as per schedule and as promised. The performance of the product is also very good considering that this is my first experience with an Apple product. However at times (it's been just 1 month that I have purchased) the applications hang at times. Apart from that there are no problems with it.
Bought this masterpiece almost 8-10 months back... Honestly I was never a apple fan boy... Was very confused to opt for Nexus 7 (2012 version obviously) or this one, but since I was already using Android device for 2-3 years I opted for ipad mini over Nexus and I never regret over my decision. The performance is superb, amazing screen quality (I know its not retina display), no lag/hanging issues. Now i Know why Apple is Apple. Also the price of Ipad is still intact however the price of Nexus is less than half now... Gives so much of satisfaction as well ;)
Pretty cool experience. Got it quick n intact. The iPad is iPad of course. After upgrading to IOS 7, its just so much cooler. Apple it is :)
Already holding a nice Android phone (Sony Xperia S) hence decided to buy something different so the only option remained was Apple iPad. This iPad mini is pretty cool tablet. - sophisticated looks - long battery life - good cameras - great device stability - fast transitions from one app to other - immediately upgraded to ios7 Value for money. No regrets at all. Single dis-advantage: no Bluetooth connectivity to non-apple devices. (Definitely tweaks would be available) Nice service from flipkart. Got the product in 2 days. Happy Shopping!!!!
It was really a nice experience from flipkart again. This is my 3rd purchase and its always good to buy from you. Best regards.
This is one of my favorites.....Nice display, soothing graphics....Very good for watching high definition videos....Camera is good in daylight....Video quality of the camera is great....A worth buy....
nice apple product..wish it would have larger screen like ipad 2.good resolution..nice for reading ebooks..playing games..but some apps are useless without presence of wifi..
Everyone knows that apple is such a great company giving awesome experiences on their devices !! Comparing it with NEXUS tablet is just no use ,yes the price is high but it gives the worth for such a device If u have a liking towards apple ,just go get it :)
This is the best tablet at this price. Don't waste money on Android tabs, buy this and remain satisfied. Flipkart delivery was awesome, got it the next day.
I bought my Ipad mini from flipkart and I am very much satisfied with the product and service of flipkart. Ipad mini is a value for money apple product. Apple cant be compared to Nexus as u need to compare a apple with a apple :-)
The product is simply excellent. No comparison with any other tablet. No other can even come near to an iPad, an apple product for that matter.
Nice product I have ever used. I am happy with this product. I have been using this product since six months and till now I never faced any issues. And it's very smooth to use and very fast I felt. Worth to money and I suggest to buy this product who want to by apple product.
had second thoughts about it as i was eyeing Samsung tab 3 , but then saw reviews on you tube and had first hand experience of this product. Amazing product really , touch is amazing and so fluid and also i was able to sync it with my iPhone within a minute. Just go for it and yes flip-kart delivered it within a day... really good.
I bought this product from amazon at 18k. As ipad mini retina was quite heavy priced, i resort to old mini. I have used android on my smartphone and didnt find it that much efficient. Also, android has one common prob- After using for 5-6 months it becomes quite jagged. THough i was considering nexus 7 old for its price bt at the end it all boils down to apple experience. As per product, ipad really gives u wow feeling. Also u can transfer all type of video files(which use to be a big prob earlier) using vlc bypassing itunes! overall nice product ...though nexus 7 is no bad with its performance and price.. But Apple has some style...right!!
Pros- 1. Very vibrant and colourful display. 2. Very responsive touch 3. Fits easily in hands (easy to carry around) 4. Nice and easy OS. Cons- 1. Screen size lil bit smaller than ideal 2. Pixels are visible sometimes 3. Charging is slow Overall very satisfying device....
Perfect quality.Apple signature is very evident.Good value for money.Sharp photos and excellent music sound.
if ur looking for class, buy apple or else if ur looking for features go for other tablets coz the ipad cannot do half of the things the other tablets can but then its apple and its got the standard
Overall it was good experince buying this product. It has some cool features in it . Panasonic have launched many new products with cool offers in this diwali season.
Upon the release of ipad mini with retina and ipad air.... apple has decided to cut prices on ipad mini...! then it will be onli US$299 ... ( close to 19000 ) ...... that means if u wait till november 1 ( thats when apple releases Ipad mini with retina worldwide..).... u will get the same ipad mini at much lesser price .... Hope this HELPs...!
Do not buy any other tablet wait and buy this. This mini is too good handy and awesome performance :) Apple tusi great ho !!!!
My iPad mini is my 1st Apple gadget I'm using and is 8months old from now and I'm with the new iOS 7 and 71 apps installed in it including high end games like Asphalt 8 Airborne, Fifa '14, Infinity blade 2, Real Racing 3 and other games like dead trigger, temple run, subway etc etc. and as a musician, I use apps like Garageband, Traktor Dj, Cubasis on my iPad itself. Well I won't go for the specs anymore. I'm pretty focused on the performance after updating my iPad to iOS7. Well many complained of slowing down, but mine didn't. Some minor hiccups though, but unnoticeable. And I shouldn't complain about this as I love my iPad for playing games and I leave my apps opened in background throughout the day and close them all before I reach my bed at night. That means, those high end games and my other office apps are kept minimised throughout the day keeping the background app refresh active! If this was a case in a Nexus 7, the tegra 3 quad core wouldn't allow you to keep these many high end apps in the background as when I was testing nexus 7 by playing Real Racing 3, I found a reduced details than the iPad, and I found that the CPU usage was much high, whereas even after updating to iOS 7, Real Racing, nor Infinity blade or Asphalt 8 has reduced a bit a quality!! The battery life of iPad amazed me since the day I'm the owner of it. Apple promises of 10 hours of battery life, and it keeps its promise with heavy game play and provides more than a day backup on medium use with garageband and traktor dj with medium game play! Just awesome!!! Also it is the best to read eBooks and the iBook interface? Every one will be getting envy on you on seeing the interface.. I was low on budget and I just wanted to have an Apple device and so I bought a 16GB, wifi version iPad mini, but you know what? I fell in love with it. So light. So sleek, so beautiful, the classic built and the fine cut edges makes its look much more appealing and premium and I think the engineering on an Apple device makes it more pricy than others. You can view all types of document file formats from .pdf to all other Microsoft Office formats. For better viewing download the app Document by readdle and you are open to all. Well there is no free document editor for Android also, you have to buy. In android, piracy is allowed which is strictly prohibited in Apple, so be legal by buying apps. There are paid apps like polaris office, or Quick office for your iOS to edit Microsoft office documents. These are also priced the same in Android. One of the best thing in Apple is that, you have to keep your eyes open to get your favourite premium apps for free as apple features them in App of the Day or App of the week. And you'll never get them free in android!! And you need not buy apps cz each and every app in the app store has anreal quality unlike in the Google Play store. About the mail attachments, you can mail multiple attachments at a time using the app Documents by Readdle. But you cannot email music as again apple takes care of the privacy. You cannot send music. You cannot download music from other websites using the browsers. The browser will play the music but won't allow you to download, you can again use Document by readdle to download music. And iTunes have each and every music from local language music to hindi... It has a vast library!!!! One of the best feature of Apple devices is that you'll get several updates and not just one or two or maximum 5 like in Android devices. I had more to say but I need to sum up. I sum up by saying that I have spent my ?21900 for buying a gadget, and this gadget is returning me back each and every penny by its service!!! Still no problems yet!!! I love my iPad mini..l
I got these from flipkart on 31st August.it is a fantastic device for gaming, video calling and for all the things that are necessary for a tablet. It doesn't have retina display but still the display is very good.runs all heavy graphics superbly without any lag. And Apple gives software updates frequentl. Rear camera takes some decent photographs in light and front camera is superb. Don't feel that ram is too low (512mb) it runs everything fine without a single lag issue.so worth buying it.
As usual flipkart delivered it on time and awsm packaging..And i got it for 19K in happy hour deal by flipkart..Worth every penny. The screen is gorgeous even without Retina Display. overall completely satisfied with both flipkart and Apple :D
This is the best ipad available in the market. Guys Hurry UP!!!! There is great offers and deals present on the PANASONIC.
best tablet ever better than any other tablet in this range[tab 3 neus 7] cons 1 dont lag 2 gud battery backup
Apple products need no introduction, have been using ipad and now ipad mini. Amazing product from Apple.
Ipad mini is simply amazing and if you are planning to buy a tablet, better go for it. I have been using ipod touch 4th for quite sometime and now i got the ipad mini thru flipkart. Usually developers say, android tablets may be customized and apple ecosystem does not allow you to do, but the android customization will be done only after rooting the phone to get access to the kernel....(which voids the warranty)...So no regrets to buy ipad mini..... Pros: 1. Better Battery, lasting for 10 hours 2. Good resolution 3. With 512MB RAM, its rocking like anything (i have opened almost 40 applications and still the game Subway Surfer works without any lag) 4. There are huge number of apps in the Apple store dedicated for ipad (also you can download the apps that were developed for iphone too). 5. good response time in the touch. 6. internet is fast as it uses 802.11b/g/n.... 7. ios7 ecosystem, extremely superb..... Cons: 1. Retina screen is absent (But that doesn't make any difference) 2. No ear pods So if you are thinking to procure a tablet with a budget of 20k, better try ipad mini. Flipkart delivered the ipad mini in just one day (chennai)
Its really awesome product. we cant compare this product with another. because apple makes all product only for premium customer. Some good features: Attractive design. A lot of useful apps in mostly all language. good battery backup (can watch 4 movies in single full charging) very useful for read magazine and book. All video formats can play. Bad Features: No single bad feature Simple Awesome, outstanding Must but. Santosh
Flip karts service is great. No doubt about it. It is the product that fails my expectations. When you pay close to 20k for a tablet, you expect it to be the ultimate. The iPad is everything but ultimate. Yes the product design is good, build quality is premium but it lacks the basic capabilities which cheap android tablets have these days. I gifted this to my wife and she asked me a simple question of how she can watch a movie from her portable hard drive on the iPad. Sound like a very simple question but the answer turned out to be complicated. Very very complicated. Either you have to spend a ton of cash on buying connectors and other stuff or have the hard drive configured over wifi. Both of these options seem ridiculous to a techie like me. Leave alone non technical users who just want to watch a movie and don't care about any of the technicalities. So why does Apple charge so much for a device that isn't so simple as Apple claimed it to be? I guess apple charges just because they can. This year apple moved up the rank to beat coca-cola to become the most valuable brand on the planet. Here's the fact. Apple's products are very expensive and once people just buy for the sake of showing off. Once you buy an apple product you will have to invest money and more money buying the various accessories and connectors and apps and continue feeding the white elephant. It is nice to have but expensive to maintain and isn't half as good as the competition on the market. Coming back to the tablet, the iPad or none of apples products for that matter are good value for money. They are not even half their worth. If you are looking for a good tablet and want to replace your computer, I recommend any windows 8 tablet. If budget is your concern then go for android. You will not be disappointed.
ipadmini (wifi-model)-go, if you have wifi, otherwise it waste ipadmini (wifi-cellular)- it good, if you have capacity to buy after purchasing it: you have spent another 3000 rupees for accessories like case & cover, if screen protector, ear phones..like etc. you have to purchase so many games from appstore and few applications for msoffice,photoshop. Review: 1.its screen quality is good. 2.product is robust,good finish material and light weight, to handle in one hand for long hours 3. charging losts upto more than 10 hours in reading and for gaming it around 7-8 hours
Apple made each and ever product for premium customer , rather than feature company concentrate on Quality . It doesnt mean that apple have null feature , product have enough feature for day to day life , company also made product for smooth experience so that customer feel apple's quality while use using other product . Apple Mini : I think no need to give review as already product have enough satisfaction result . Its best budget tablet for great experience i will suggest you for this product , i believe you will get great experience P.S : Flipkart is best place for this product , best price , free cover ,emi option, great delivery i am impress with flipkart tracking page where you will get time to time update of your product :)
It vl make ur day, with a stunning display, and the best operating system. Perfect in one hand , feels richer then any tab around. Battery is more then enough, and the camera is superb. the only sad part is no flash.
there are so many advantages in holding an apple especially when u r out holding this beauty..she makes you feel rich!!apple ipad is a standard high class apple is meant for status I know because i own one and its smooth and awesome... just close ur eyes and go for it...
I have been using this from 10 months and i didn't regret purchasing this product. The only thing android lover's keep talking about is customization, no necessity for itunes for file transfer etc etc. But in all other aspects believe me guys mini kicks off far ahead 1) BUILD QUALITY & WEIGHT: The slimmest and lightest ipad and pretty well designed to hold in your palm. It even fits in my jeans pocket perfectly when i really need to put it in under some circumstances 2) BATTERY BACKUP: Though it's been 10 months i get 10+ hours backup on normal usage, 8 hours for gaming and video play etc Seriously this battery backup makes me crazy !!! 3) RAM: It has got 512mb RAM, but guys seriously please dont compare it to 1gb RAM android tablets. Your iOS never lags or gets struck with this ram and every game and app runs just flawless. Never think like " 512mb isn't sufficient" for iOS and Windows All other specs can be found any where but, if you are wanna try apple ipad mini dont hesitate guys, And now you have VLC PLAYER app for free you can watch any format videos on you mini. The only thing you might have to compromise is using itunes for file transfers, less PPI when compared to nexus 7. In rest of the cases you find mini as the best choice, I
Being an Android user I thought much before going for iPad but I still needed it for testing some of my dev work. Apple make their own hardware and software so they can use and tune it better than anyone else. iPad mini uses the full resources and gives a smooth experience no matter what you are running, from a simple and lighter app or a graphics heavy racing game. The competitors being more mighty looking tablets in terms of hardware do not deliver this kind of experience as they really can't know what app developers are going to do. Right now the other tablet makers are in a race of bringing in Dual Core, Quad core processors with loads of RAM and big batteries to run them but its all useless as we are using tablets not to replace phones or laptops or any Dev machines. Even if the screens are made more PPI rich human eyes have limits to see the pixel depth so there is no point in bringing that in. Agreed that Apple products are somewhat higher on prices but are worth the money. If you are looking out for a small form factor tablet around 7 inches go for iPad Mini. It will make you smile happily every-time you use it.
It is your perfect companion. With the dimension and weight, it sits into a single palm and you can use it as your ebook reader. Awesome to game on since holding it is easy. It is not retina display - but it hardly matters. Have played, read and viewed movies on it and it is brilliant. Nothing else comes close to this.
Excellent service by flipkart by delivering this in less than 48 hours in perfect condition. 10% off is a killer deal. Android tablets are no match for apple. Anyone who plans to shellout 15k for tablet think of spending an extra 5k for a robust and everlasting device. Though there is a burden of iTunes, the pain is worth it.
Guys I am using this device from past one month all I can say is its just awesome... Though the specs doesn't looks good but it's very optimised and on using it on daily basis you will not even feel that it is havin 512 mb ram nd all... my personal suggestion is Go For It it's worth it....
First of all hats off to flipkart for the express delivery...less than 48 hrs that's just awesome. About the product its great device.best thing about it the battery life more than 10 hrs whatever you do that's superb.screen is decent .software experience is smooth that's what u expect of iOS .app collection is also good . About the cons Had hard time to get a decent flash browser. Also memory ....as u can't connect external memory without jailbreak it's hard to contain with 16gb .but I checked the net for some getaway and come to know that their are few wireless card reader which can read even external HDD . I would like to request flipkart to ship this kinda things as well.
If you are planning to buy. Buy this. Very good product. Nobody in the market can compete with Apple till now (not Google Nexus not even Samsung and not even Sony Xperia tablets). The only competitor for Apple is themselves.
I am using this product for over two months now. Practically useless except for browsing. That too can be frustrating as part of the screen is not sensitive to touch. Obviously you can pluck apples! (only)
This is an awesome ipad with exclusive features. No one will be disappointed. Pros: Good face time camera Excellent picture quality Memory is great Cool brightness Light weight Handy Good for playing any games Subway surfers and temple run work like a charm Back camera is good Photobooth a spirit of excellence Good battery Good speakers Good memory No lags and hang Works smoothly if a hundred background apps are running Fingerprint resistant screen Scratch resistant body AND thanks to the lightning connector one can easily charge the ipad Good standby time Cons: Cannot put sim.... GO FOR IT FOR SURE..... A good run for all the samsung haters like me....!!! Hope you like my review
Brilliant device cool fast great mind blowing created battery life superb apps great store can play beautiful games and hd videos great face time and front camera and back camera with great can even use great photo booth
The Ipad Mini is what the ipad should always have been. Its feather light and is so easy to carry with you that you may not notice the weight at all. Perfect to read books, surf web, photos, skype among other .
Hey friends, here i want to share somethings about apple product. apple product is known for it's brilliant build quality and simplicity. i have faith in apple products that's why i ordered not 1 but 3 ipad minis for me and my family. many people talking about ipad that it has only 512MB of RAM and 1GHZ dual core processor but the thing is they don't know that apple uses different Operating system called iOS which don't need quadcore or octacore processor for faster, smooth performance and apple maid more than 3 lakh apps designed only for ipad. these apps are specially made for ipad screen resolution and u will not notice any type of lag while using it otherwise apps will only stretched like we seen in all other android tablet.
Verbery good one Very good one.........i only recommend apple products to buy...because its good and highly sensitive better than other ol tabs.... Super battery pack up .....;.... And the main thing is by sme apps we can directly add videos songs without i tunes....
It's well known that any apple products are always costlier than an equivalent product of the other brand. However, I personally feel that this product is justified for what I paid. (With flipkart 10% cash back offer) What driven me to buy this (Pros) 1. A clean Operating System. 2. Longer Battery Life (more than 12 hrs, wifi on). 3. Large no. Of apps (2,75,000 + ). 4. Faster and better gaming Experience. 5. Optimised screen size and beautiful design. What made me to think thrice 1. Obviously price for the spec. You can get a tablet with better specs than this, also for atleast 30% lesser price of this one. However, after youtubing some video comparison between ipad vs nexus 7 n kindle fire, I have finally chosen this... The gaming graphics and experience in ipad is far better than the other tablets with better specs... Thanks, Hemanth
iPad mini is one of the greatest inventions by Apple. The main reason why iPad mini is more popular than the other iPads is because of its unique size. At 7.9 inches it is the smallest tablet released by Apple. Yes as there are two sides of a coin iPad mini too has many faults. The 1024 x 768 pixels make you want to throw the iPad mini and the only way you can transfer files is through iTunes is frustrating and complicated. But it is not true that iPad mini cant support flash content. There are hundreds of apps which allows you to support flash content on iPad mini. And the best part is that all the apps that work on other iPads will work on iPad mini.
Pros: . Awesome performance. Like a silk touch. I have 2 other tablets but nothing matches iOS. . Great looking, sturdy and sleek built. . Quality of iApps. . Amazing flipcart delivery. Delivered in 2 days. . Even though resolution is less, color saturation is very good. . Gives same fluidity and performance after 1 year. Most androids becomes very slow and buggy over the period even with 1 gig RAM and processors. Ultimately, you ll have own an iPad in order to 'feel' it. Cons: . Average audio/video quality. Doesn't support all formats. . Battery life with WiFi on. But even all other tabs suffers from this. . iTunes. Sucky software. You can't use it a storage device. . No Email saving. Pricey office suite application. . Price. Should be around 17K. That's what it cost in US All in all, I spend more time in apps and using outlook and surfing for which, it's great. I don't listen songs and clicking pictures so I am okay with average feature.
its really awesome for its A5 chip's performance, which is apart of ARM(Advanced RISC(Reduced Instruction Set Computer)Machine); buit by Apple itself. But since Apple makes both its- hardware and software, its quite "private" as mentioned by Steve Jobs. Its bluetooth is only supported on apple products and it doesn't has external memory slot. Its a type of safe as it is far away from 'virus-infection' due to memory cards... However its fabulous display creeps out all its cons. If you are thinking too much for it, don't do so,.. just go for it.. "APPLE" it is..!!
If u want a tablet that will last a long time, go for the ipad mini. Nexus 7 only looks good on paper but in the reality , ipad mini has no comparison . Although the processor is a bit outdated , ipm works without any lag even if you are playing heavy games like asphalt 7 or dead trigger The iOS 6 is better than android and the ipm is a far more lighter and premium tab than its competitors Also lots of accessories are available for it and it is the most beautiful tab in the market
Good service by flipkart but had issues converting to an EMI which is still under process. Coming to the produce its as advertised. the display is better than the IPad 2 and the cameras both front and back have been improved.(has the same cameras as IPad 3). Good for skyping and Face-time. No Lag what so ever. can hold with a single hand with no effort. Half the weight compared to IPad 3. The only drawback is that the Earphones are not provided with the set. If u are not concerned with the screen size(1.5 inch diff approx) and mostly use it for reading and moderate gaming... this product is for you not to mention 10k cheaper than the Ipad 3.
Bought 16 GB ipad mini . Its our first purchase of Apple product. Its very very nice product. Value for money with elegant looks . Proud owner of an apple . Flipkart has delivered the same within 24 hours of order. Great....
Flipkart were quite quick to deliver this within 2 days. + Great tablet, not retina but Magazines, Comics look fantastic. + good premium feel, size is perfect. - Stutters on occasions. - bit pricey for non retina display.
I Got my product in hand in second day of purchase. Thanks for delivering so quick.. Box packed.. Good condition..... I'm loving the experience of buying from flip kart. I will definitely buy more from here. Keep it up (y) Thanks...
Let me get this out straight... this device is not one that you possess as your primary computing device.. I don't think anybody does that with tablets. But within the category of tablets that one owns for fun, connectivity and above all, premium feel.. i think this device is awesome. So buy if you want to play games, surf internet and read and can pay 22k for this... Pros - 1. Excellent hardware 2. State of the art touch 3. Good processing capabilities - no lags ever 4. The right size in tablets.. one big enough to read comfortably and yet can be handled easily 5. Good camera - both back and front 6. Good screen resolution Cons 1. No flash memory - storing stuff is convoluted and not worth the time. 2. Browsers keep refreshing on their own (I am not sure why that happens but is very annoying)
I got my ipad mini way back in November 2012 wen it had just launched in India,as a die hard android geek I never wanted to shift over to apple,but I took the risk n instead of the nexus 7 tab I got the ipad mini.. Total VFM..iOS on the ipad mini is so buttery smooth that my htc one x feels like a punctured race car. ipad mini tablet apps quality is far more superior n better optimized as compared to the ones on google play store. Also there are tons of ways to get free n paid apps on the ipad without even jail breaking. The 5mp camera produces real vibrant colours n the HD VIDEO RECORDING is smooth as silk. So if ur planing to buy a budget tablet,then look no further as the ipad mini will be all u need,n pls avoid android tablets coz they lack build quality n app quality...plus ipad mini has tons of accessories. Also I get over 20 hrs of continuous use on a single charge with wifi on..so battery life is awesome...
Guys I purchased the apple IPad mini 10 days ago I have bought a 32gb iPad mini and I'm loving this experience I was using galaxy s2 and had a lot of problems after 6 months . The phone lagged like A snail. I prefer apple over other handset makers because its simply the best There is no virus in the apple networking I have downloaded high graphic games like temple run2 , shadow gun, nova 3,infinity blade and modern combact . The device neves lags or hangs .its perfectly smooth as butter. The touch is outstanding compared to the galaxy. I am a gaming freak. And for all gaming freaks this is the best buy. If you go for phones .it offers you just a 5inch screen which is absolutely not bad, but nothing like having the experience of an 8inch screen. The iPad 2,3.4 is too big and is very hard to handle. The iPad mini's size is perfect. But the camera is disappointing. I know it only offers a 5mp camera but the images when zoomed in and shot is very shabby and is very disappointing. There is also no flash available with the camera. Some people thing that the apple devices is very restricted. Reviews from apple haters are My god I feel suffocated and all those crazy stuff. I know it's prey irritating to download songs from your computer, put it inside iTunes and transfer it to your apple device but it isn't a herculent job either. Android flagships are nothing compared to the mighty apple devices. I ensure you guys the iOS is very simple and user friendly. The android phones like s4, s3 are very heavily loaded with features and these phones lags. Though these phones may offer you a quad core processor but it simply sucks. The iPad mini also runs on the latest iOS 6.1.3 which is trily awesome. It looks attractive and rich. Guys but be careful the device is too delicate and may break if it falls down . Ensure its in the flip over I hope this review will help you make a good choice
1) It will not let you transfer files except iTunes which needs to be installed in your PC. 2) It does not support video formats except mp4 and m4v niether it has a free player like MxPlayer in android. 3) Battery problems after an year. This is from my personal experience. If you still want to go for Apple products then its your take.
ipad mini. few reason Why you must buy ipad mini (1)Great Product for very good price With the iPad mini bringing the Apple tablet experience to a brave new budget world. (2)The 7.9-inch iPad Mini is slightly larger than competitors like the Kindle Fire and Nexus 7, a little over half the size of the iPad 4, and yet,when you pick it up with one hand,it seems just right. (3)While the full-sized iPad begs to be held with both hands, it feels natural to hold the Mini in one hand. Compare the iPod Mini to others i said don't compared it to any one.. (4)ipad mini comes with powerful IOS6 operating system( 200 new Features) . one of the most advance OS in the world... (5) Over 300,000 apps just for i pad mini. (6) Ultra fast Wireless. (7) 7.9 inch Display. (8) Great Accessories in the market and (9) is power of apple, Trust of apple, apple is No 1 in customer satisfaction ( In a study by J.D. Power and Associates). if u owned this mini pad u loved your i pad experience.$$$$$
1. Screen: Larger screen and better aspect ratio(4:3 vs 16:9 on the Nuxus 7) allows for better internet surfing, better games, more comfortable keypad to type on. 2. Apps: The iPad has over 250,000 specially made for the iPad and all of the iPhone apps work as well. Nexus 7 has just 100 or so apps and others look ugly on it's 7" screen(because they are just stretched out phone apps). 3. Ease of use: It's much more simple to use and has many productivity applications that can allow you to do some serious work as opposed to the Nexus 7 which is just a 'showy' device because of it's lack of apps. 4. The cameras are much better, it's ergonomics and slim profile make it easier to use and hold in one hand(keep in mind this is almost 8 inches) which truly allows you to use the device to it's full potential. 5. Longer battery life and more security for your credit card payments and every single app is better on the iPad than on Android(see the Gmail app on both tablets if you don't believe me) 6. Better audio quality and metal construction vs plastic on the Nexus and not at all slow even while playing games like Vice City. CONS: The screen ratio will make movies shrink a bit and you have to convert every movie into .mp4 format but that's it. Bottom line: Buy the Nexus if you like to tweak around with your device and like to be geeky all the time. For everyone else, the iPad is the tablet of choice. It's a brilliant experience that only Apple can offer. TIP: if you can, wait till the end of the year and buy the iPad mini 2 which will include a retina display as well.
I got this last week from iPlanet nearby and very satisfied with the performance of this tablet. Android tabs are no where near to the experience of an iPad Awesome build quality Great performance(don't go by the specs have a hands on n then feel the difference) Awesome app store (all the major games work flawlessly) Great screen (people complain about its ppi and forget the colour saturation part,take a high res pic and see it urself on nexus 7 and ipad mini) Perfect size(so handy n portable) All apple products come with unmatched service and resale value Dont think more,if you are planning to buy a tablet go for it
dont buy this tablet. It will burst into pieces. it is very slippery. the amazing thing about this tablet is that it has amazing camera, good touch screen, good everything. BUT, it is a very bad tablet. since. it is a nice tablet you should buy it. DO NOT BUY IT. Ask apple to complete eating its apple.if you want to buy an apple ipad mini go to a real shop. I have bought 2 ipads but i suggest you not to buy it
recently switched from Android to iOS and found out that using Apple products for even one day can answer all your questions that why they come in elite class... Pros: Very responsive, stylish, slim like paper and plethora of free apps in App Store. Cons: Not as open as Android, requires iTunes for each and every transfer from PC to iPad, cannot customize interface. Still iPad mini can be must have product.
no homescreen, no external card slot, no calling features, no sharing, no mass storage mode, really nothing it has..... what it has in a good touch, thats it........ go for samsung galaxy tab 2. u can have your own homecreen, u can use extendable card slot (upto 32 GB). u can make calls, messages to your friends, group play. multitasking in tab 2 is very excellent that u will be abe to play and see 3 HD videos at a time.
Every Device is meant to Perform their own task with its own limits you can't compare a Tablet to a Super computer. Tablet is designed for compactness , so that you can do task on the Go..which is not a replacement of your super power PC. Don't Expect it to be As of Now its a Beautiful device which is classy and light weight Apple is Apple , Brought the Touch screen Technology to the Market ( first of its Kind ) Quality Never Comes Cheap ... if this had 3G , it was a 5 * product
Hello all, let me share with you people my experience using an ipad mini with some ratings. I had a Spice stellar before and have also tried Ipad 2,3 and 4. all below mentioned ratings are for the ipad mini with 10 being the maximum: Display 8.5 : having used a spice stellar pad before, the display is very good, may not be as good as ipad 4 though. Design 9 : It makes the ipad 4 look massive and outdated in the design department, seriously, why the original ipad design in the latest ipad? The build quality and looks are simply amazing! always go for a black, because white borders are too distracting, on the other hand, black borders seems to blend with the display. Gaming 8 : the gaming experience is very good, the graphics is superb, it can easily handle nova 3, but, you might feel the need for a little more real estate. But, no way it is congested, very comfortable to hold for long hours. OS 7.5 : iOS 6 is one of the most criticised mobile OS and I agree with it. ..having used android 4.2 I can clearly notice the lack of options to customise. Ex: no widgets, no custom keyboard, no file manager, the iOS 6 is not really bad, the experience is still very good, the 5 finger pinch app exit feature is superb! The user interface is silk smooth, and you can feel the richness of the jitter free interface. Browsing 6 : this is a bit of a disappointment, the biggest culprit here is flash, it simply ruins your browsing experience. It is also very hard to read in the portrait mode, as you have to double tap every time you open a web page. What is the point in going for a large display when you have to double tap every time? Movie experience 4 : simply too small to watch movies, the display quality may be good, you can almost forget watching movies on this. Battery 9 : continuous gaming the battery lasts for upto 6.5 hours. a bit of gaming and browsing continuously it lasts for upto 8 hrs! Multitasking 10 : I run several apps together and it does not lag one bit. I can safely say that iOS 512MB RAM = Android 1GB RAM all apple softwares are so well written unlike android and windows, there are practically no bloatwares. I would try to answer some of the questions springing in the minds of a prospective customer: Wifi or cellular? Wifi! I wirelessly tether from my android phone and the speed is very good! I have gps in my android phone, so I do not need it either. Black or white? Black! as mentioned before, white borders are too distracting, it makes your display look smaller, but the back silver panel on the white is incredibly sexy! Ipad mini or ipad 2/3/4? Ipad mini! The ipad 2/3 and 4 are too big, the weird 4:3 aspect ratio, very difficult to carry around. Those thick bazels! the original ipad design even now in the ipad 4 th generation? What is apple thinking? Ipad 2 display is very bad, ipad 3 hardware not good enough to handle retina display, that is why ipad for was quickly released within a span of 6 months. 16GB or 32GB? 16GB is good enough for apps and games. I do not store music and videos in my ipad mini. I still give the ipad mini a 4 star rating for the sheer pleasure of possesing an apple product, the promising iOS7 update in the future, some complete and solid fix for flash in the near future. ..come on what are your options? Samsung is selling overpriced garbage, Nexus 7 display is too small and 10 is overpriced. The reliabilty of Indian and chinese tablets are questionable, I returned my spice stellar within 1 month of purchase. Amazon kindle 8 inch and 9 inch are yet to be released in India, at the momment I think ipad mini is the best your money can buy:) use it now and resell later in future if you find a better product, apple products have a good resale value:)
At 22k budget,this is the best tablet in the market...if you're a game lover...just go for it...looks & touch interfaces are great..but I think apple iOS is a little bit difficult for android users & new gadget users..no data transfer is possible without iTunes..this problem must be solved..processor is very fast..although it has 512 mb of ram.it has 16 GB of internal memory,but 13.7 GB is usable.which is problematic for movie lovers...bt in overall no other tab is comparable to this product..in this budget..camera is not so good.bt it has 5 mp primary &1.2 mp secondary camera...at last in my opinion..it is the best worth priced tab in market..go for it...& also thank u FLIPKART ...for its surfer fast delivery...thanks...:)
There is no need for me to write a review about the Apple iPad Mini - there are more qualified websites who can provide in-depth review of the product. I am writing a review on the service of FlipKart as it was horrendous but now they were able to resolve the matter. They had claim it to be delivered 2-3 Business Days and it showing a much later delivery date at the courier company's website. There were many options to purchase this item online but due to the reputation of FlipKart I went with them. This present was for someone's birthday so the time was of great importance. Anyway, after filing a complaint the customer service representative were able to resolve the issue and have it delivered on-time. It is important to stay on top of your order, especially when they are gifts which must reach on time. Words of Wisdom: You should always set low expectations and then beat, not vice versa. Thank you for resolving the matter!
I got my ipad mini on 8th march 2013 thanks to flipkart for quick delivery,i opened the box with a lots of excitement the first look of the ipad is just WOW!...apple have done really a good thing to launch a lower range ipad series..As this is my first apple product so i did not find much cons in the ipad.But frankly the pros which i got to know.. 1. no lags at all while playing any game or using any app(as a gaming freak) 2. 5 stars for battery life 3. it is fast even if it is having A5 dual core same as ipad 2. 4. Display is good don't expect retina eye display in this price range. 5. Light in hand 6. App store got hell lot of apps 7. wifi connectivity is good 8. sound is brilliant. 9. for lightening cable you will get the data transfer faster than previous generation ipads with 30 pin cable. 10. iOS 6.1.2 update.
If u r a true geek don't buy this ever, and don't buy any apple product No flash memory - you can't store any file which is unsupported by iPad format Every transfer require iTunes n thus a computer U can send only one attachment at a time in a email except photo n videos U can't transfer MS Office files even until n unless u buy supporting softwares which cost 1650 rs Very restricted, if u r geek then u will feel suffocated Buy - if u have to go for good responsive display, music quality, good processing, play games Kick - if u r real techie
I own iPad(big) but mini looks good too. I have used mini and it is full Apple experience..iPad is better than other tablets. No lag, no problems just smooth experience. We are entering Post-PC era. Tablets and smartphones are being huge part of our daily lives. Those bulky, ugly, virus-prone PCs has to compete with tablets for consumer attention. Like Steve Jobs said average consumer needs a device that can give a good Internet experience with convenience. iPad does that. This is all I need in a tablet. Sent from my iPad
Been using the iPad mini for now 1 month...i'm quite sure this is the time i should review it . Screen: Have used my bro Samsung Galaxy Tab 2 , my iPad mini does look a lot bigger in dimensions & screen size ...its color reproduction is also very good.....(vibrant) & the auto brightness just works fine.....!! Processor: although it has A5 chip which is similar to iPhone 4s , i never kinda found any lag while using it....i have played heavy duty games on it (NFS most wanted,Real Racing2hd , Real Racing 3,Modern Combat 4,Real Steel,Asphalt 7,GTA 3,Mass Effect Infiltrator,Lili , Sky Gamblers-Air Supremacy , Shadow Gun,Contra Killer & many more Graphics intensive games...!! Ram: yep it has 512 MB ram that's kinda low compared to the android devices but guess what it ain't running android its iOS which is kinda less ram hungry & virtual ram usage is @peak ... so let me summon up to u ...if u open 50 apps on your iPad still there wont be any lag...coz of virtual Ram ....& also when device is cold booted (Started) there is about 250mb Ram free (depending upon the services u keep & notifications & apps on the springboard..) Design: From day one there wasn't a day that i didn't admire the apple's build quality...& pretty good ergonomics ...fits perfectly in my hand ..little bit slippery but still good Camera: You don't wanna miss these camera quality ,it is on par with my nikon Point & shoot camera 10 MB of course Megapixels don't matter , the lens matters & guess what it has the same lens which is in iPhone 5 which is best renowned for its superb pictures by far...& this device performs perfectly in Macro (Small Less distance) Photography... Secondary Camera is also good its HD ... & video chatting works just fine...& video quality on primary is also good 1080p Connectors: day one i m happy with its lightning connecter ,its so small & irreversible.... Speakers : Stereo sound is also reproduced @ every instance mostly in Hip -Hop & R&B songs O.S: there is the plethora of apps for the iPad mini..... its the apple eco-system....95% apps run fined on my iPad mini ...*& I'm not gonna lie some notorious apps crashed & that was just once in a week like something... Battery: it has got 4500mAh + battery ... apple claims 10 hours on WiFi my statistics video -8.3hours full HD audio - never mind it goes on & on WiFi browsing 9.7 hours eBook reading :16 hours standby : 1month (Apple claims) daily normal usage it last for around 1.5 day. heavy gaming :6-8 hours (NFS , Shadow Gun etc) it takes 2 hours to charge my iPad with standard charger Storage: you only get 13.7 GB of storage space...that's is perfect coz bits & bytes calculations & i gotta tell you if u have more money opt for 32GB coz i have 16GB & its not enough 160 apps (12 GB )installed right now no movies no songs 10 eBooks & some office files so most space is taken by the apps Sensors: just play some sensor games for eg. Temple run 2 it works perfectly with my accelerometer ... & 3 -axis gyro sensor for all directions tilt (360 degree panoroma) magnetometer for compass (digital compass) really helpful in astromony & navigation ambient light sensor - for auto brightness My Recommended Apps: aNote HD iBooks +Downloader Google Earth djay FlipBoard 360 DMD iFileExplorer System Status Touch Calc Compass HD Paper Evernote iWork iLife mobisystems-CollinsEnglishDictAndThes 1Password night sky Adobe ps Touch Documents to Go HD QuickOffice overall i m in love with this gizmo ...if you want some great apps list by me do email me ... kautilyasave@gmail.com or Google Plus Me (Kautilya Save) or Facebook Me (Kautilya Save) P.S i haven't used any scratch guard for it ,coz search Youtube its scratch proof & i have bought 1 accessory from BELK (Rs 550/-)- its duplicate smart cover (APPLE SMART COVER wasn't available in my area @ that instance)
i buy this tablet and i saw that it does not support some apps but those are running my brothers samsung tab 2.it has started hanging in few days and the its wifi gets damaged. i complaint to apple service centre but they said that we konw that your tab has gets damaged under inyhe warranty but we have not responsible for inner harm of apple i pad mini because it was the cheapest tab yet developed by apple. but samsung tab 2 is more better than ipad mini.it also has call facility. please dont buy this tab
I bought Ipad mini yesterday after lot of deliberation. I was really disappointed by the price of Nexus 7 in India, it is double of what they are selling in US. While Ipad mini is Rs. 3.5k to 4k more in Indian market. Specs wise even though Nexus 7 is better on paper, the screen quality, display and user experience of Ipad Mini is unbeatable. I was looking for a tablet with good display especially for reading books, surfing net. Ipad Mini fits the bill. If you are more into playing games I would recommend Nexus 7. It has got 1 GB RAM, quad core Tegra processor which is ideal for games. And if you are some one who wants every possible feature into a single tablet and not very particular with quality go for Samsung Tab 2. Cons of Ipad Mini: . The only serious one I have seen in Ipad Mini is lack of retina display, you will observe this more in images with lot of details. The zoom quality is not that good, the pixels are coarse & grainy, it is good otherwise and much better than other tablets. . Got only wi-fi, you need to pay 8k more for cellular. For people who wanna use while travelling I would suggest buy only wifi Ipad model & purchase a cheap portable battery operated modem, which supports 2g,3g,4g, all in one. . A 16GB Ipad mini gives only 13 GB space for usage and it is not extendable. This is a serious problem for people who store lot of songs & videos. A 32 GB version costs 6k more. But you can always take the backup in PC or on iCloud. Even Nexus 7 is not extendable but you can use USB on the go cable to connect extenal Hard discs which is not possible for Ipad mini. It is out of stock in FlipKart for many days other wise I would have bought it here. Even in Imagine store it was out of stock which clearly shows its high demand.
I will pick iPad Mini for many reasons : First , Display Nexus 7 does have better resolution (and hence more ppi) whereas iPad Mini has very good color saturation which means you have only one option , If u want crispiness get N7 , whereas if u want screen to pop up colors nicely , get Mini.As far as Display is concerned 163 ppi isn't that bad for average users.For those who are using iPad 3 for a while or iPhone 4 , 4S , 5 or iPod Touch 4th would feel that this display isn't good but remaining people would really don't find fault in it. Web browsing and reading , I feel that 4:3 screen does better in web browsing as it has large screen estate and also during landscape , 3/4th screen is covered by N7 keyboard and virtual buttons. Not to forget that Screen area of iPad far big compared to N7 (As we all know that screen is measured in diagonal length). Another reason why I Pick Mini is because it is a decent screen and it already can run all apps and games without need of extra work because it carries same chip and resolution of iPad 2.So you can simply download and run all apps/games without any waiting. Second is Processor , Most would be thinking Mini RAM is only half gig whereas N7 has 1 GB RAM , but in real world usage , iPad Mini offers very smooth experience compared to N7.One may find that N7 is lagless but if u are coming from Windows Phone or iOS , N7 doesn't feels 'right' , it feels as if something is missing and those stutters really give bad experience because u are spending 20k but not 5 or 6k. Recent 4.2 Jellybean update literally crippled N7 , everything runs slow and lot of users say its unbearable now (don't believe me ? google it) and not to forget that Tegra 3 is bad in GPU. Third is Apps , This is the ultimate reason why anyone will pick iPad over any other tablet.Most of the time , I spend inside apps but I don't waste time with custom ROMs or tinkering with wallpapers or widgets and end up "setting the device" more than "using it". Apps are awesome , if u are coming from bigger iPad or from iPod Touch , all those old apps u bought will work easy and Cloud sync option in games transfers all ur scores , achievements through iCloud (assuming u use same account during activation). Everything works seamlessly and Mini has gyroscope as well (N7 too). Fourth is camera , There is nothing wrong with using tablet's camera , I use it all time and Mini has a HD camera for video calling and back has 5 MP camera with 1080p recording. Quality of footage is awesome and I am sure , its one of the best cameras around , to shoot 1080p video if u want it handy. Using photo stream , all photos will be gone to ur PC and other Apple devices (assuming u have Wifi since this model doesn't offer cellular) Fifth is Updates , Apple is always on time with updates , no delays and N7 too but iPad has edge because I am sure it will be supported longer (As an example , Google stopped supporting Nexus one with 2.3 , Nexus S with 4.1 and Galaxy Nexus surely won't get 5.0 , especially after 4.2 update which almost made GN die) Sixth is Battery , iPad is by far the best device overall in battery department , reliability is high whereas N7 battery will become shorter and shorter as u increase using widgets , flash (unofficial) and more apps run background.At first both devices get same battery but as time passes most android devices end up with shorter and shorter battery lives due to heaviness of Android. Seventh is Build quality , Once hold both devices and u will automatically know it.
The title is a little confusing but this is I want to say that if you are going for samsung then you are certainly going to miss the ultimate apple experience. Unlike it's competitors when apple launches something for a cheaper price, it still makes sure that the quality is not compromised. I hope you will benefit from this tab as much as I did. Pros: Display Speed Wi Fi connectivity Battery life Pretty Handy Cons: None till now for me
I have used so many electronic products...but I must say this was the best what money can buy.....Ebboks, newspapers, Social networking, Video calling, Email and especially games and lot many mind blowing apps....and i have used other tablets such as samsung, nexus...but ipad is way beyond all those....and best thing battery lasts for close to 7 hrs when ur using wifi...and best part it doesn't get heated up unlike other devices... If you are a first time user of apple devices...you make take some time to get along with itunes,syncing and others... you may feel few thing are restricted....but once start using it..you will never look back. Go for It!!!!!
Love this product ! Feels good in the hand and can actually grab this one with one hand unlike my ipad2 though there is a tad bit of extra effort but its manageable. Way cheaper and better than the nexus 7 india price ! Guys you can buy this product but if you are really bothered about the ppi then wait till march, apples definitely releasing the ipad mini 2 !
The Ipad Mini is what the ipad should always have been. Its feather light and is so easy to carry with you that you may not notice the weight at all. Perfect to read books, surf web, photos, skype among other . Pretty snappy. You won't notice the A5 and the 512MB RAM in daily use. It is as snappy as the bigger ipad. The only minor differences are seen when playing games live Dead Trigger, NOVA etc. Perfect for students with the just perfect screen size and portability. Awesome built and oozes quality. Specially the black version. Compared below to the Nexus 7 Bought both of them from the US in November. Will List Down Some Comparisons: Screen: IPM has lower resolution than the N7 and surely the individual pixels are coarser. But its not noticeable until you kiss the tablets close. On the other hand IPM has FAR BETTER colour saturation. You will surely notice it using them side by side. And lastly, the 0.9" extra screen size and the 4:3 ratio does wonders to the all tablet experience other than watching movies. If you plan to watch movies on a regular basis on a tablet take the N7. Specs and Performance: N7 blows IPM with raw specs but daily use but apple really does have some black magic optimizations with its iOS6 making it as smooth or even smoother than the N7. Half the cores and the RAM bearing IPM is still able to give the N7 a match when it comes to REAL world smoothness. Benchmarks may say otherwise. FEEL in HAND: There is no battle here. IPM takes the lead here and by a LONG margin. The thin profile and just the correct size make it more pleasurable to hold than its rival any day. IT exudes quality which cannot be said about the N7. APPS: Apple optimized maps are too good for the generic android apps. Use Flipboard, Skype and a few other popular apps and you will know what I mean. FLEXIBILITY: Android is the king here. Launchers, Custom ROMS and what not. IF you like to see your baby in a new set of cloths everyday, N7 is it. Apple may look like a boring nerd who never looks any different. But those with limited tech skills should prefer the ipad. CONVENIENCE: Again its Android. No itunes shit. Just simple Drag and Drop. Plus unparalleled codec support. VERDICT: The N& priced at 19.900 in India is a no brainer to get the IPM unless you are a sucker for movies. Its really every inch an ipad for several grands lesser. :)
guys don't buy nexus 7 ...asus and google are trying to exploit indians by doubling the price .....the ipad mini has much faster gpu and more great apps.....i don't recommend any body to buy nexus 7 ...at first i felt nexus 7 was good .if you watch any comparison video between nexus 7 and ipad mini you can find that the only edge nexus 7 got is with its price and (processor)..the speed of processor doesn't matter much in our every day use ...ipad got way better graphics and it will suite you best if you love gaming on your tablets . in india price of both is almost same so definitly go for ipad mini
Yes, i agree apple is apple. But Google is nothing less at this stage. Nexus 7 can be double its price in india, but its totally worth it. ipad mini and nexus 7 both are great, the difference being ios and android. Decide which os you will be more comfortable with and then buy. If you are a casual user go for ios. But if you want to explore your device, customize it according to your wish, don't think twice, go for android. Android is the fully customizable os while ios is a simpler one with less options for exploring. And particularly for this device what i feel is that nexus 7 is a little ahead for some reasons. But the final choice is between android and ios (i went for android for its wider interface, where you can do a lot without rooting). Choose wisely....
Hi frds, i bought ipad2 an year ago after they slashed 100$ when next model was launch. to accept indian using only upto 60% of the any product they buy. price wise apple is more than other tab. i was satisfied with ipad 2 features expect camera quality , and after using long days i felt some thing smaller would be better , i was waiting for this ipad mini from the rumors started. This product as grt features and touch and stability. ipad uses: 1) Have collection of photos of fav ones. 2) Browsing, read news through apps. 3) check mail often or FB and chat , skype and video chat is best. 4) some time music and videos - for HD 5) keep some fav movie 6) small games for family kids rarely. There is one option i dont knw whether apple users found , in setting - > some text speech option is there , On that first , than while browsing some article u select para than it will show copy,paste,speech . if u click speech it will read the article like news reader , in setting choose lang and speed levels. if people dont connect with internet expect inside home ,they can go for wifi models. for this purpose people can go for ipad.
I dont know how many of u have actully used these devices, or just yapping after reading reviews or reading their specs. I have used the both i have an mini & my bro has a nexus, if u just compare the specs any kid will say that nexus will win, but there is a catch, on using both i found mini is faster in terms of applications & media, i dont exactly know why, is there really a powerfull processor inside nexus or its just lies, because the A5X beats it hands down, HOW THE HELL CAN A DUAL CORE BEAT A QUAD CORE ?!!!! Go for nexus only if u dont have enough cash.
Even though Nexus 7 might have better specifications than the iPad Mini, iPad mini will be the better experience for almost anything you do in real life. This is because apple's iOS is much, much stable and proven than the android OS. in iOS, there is a perfect play between the Hardware and the software to bring out the best of what is in it. Android products need to have much higher specifications to get the same quality because Android is still a kid compared to Apple's iOS. Bottomline : Buy Apple iPad Mini if you want the best eventhough it is little costlier Buy Nexus 7 if you want to customize you themes, download applications for free, etc, etc I would buy the iPad mini anyday of the year
Cons - No retina display ( very low resolution) Still On A5 chip No Siri (Even iPod touch 5G Has got Siri Cost (with 3k more you can buy iPad 2 ) Not the best 7 inch tab yet,wait for iPad mini 2 which will come with retina display.
Everyone here is telling Nexus 7 is better than ipad mini.....but nobody ever considers the actual thinking of common consumers.....not everyone is behind the best hardware config or the resolution.....To those people who hate apple's product,why do you even bother coming here and commenting....Yes the Nexus 7 (according to many Android fan boys ) maybe having the best specs......but the experience you get while using an Apple's device is Unbeatable .....the premium feel only tell that you got your moneys worth.....the service that Apple provides here is awesome.... But i do consider the fact that Apple's product is a little pricey .....but when you consider the end result ,it is totally worth spending for... The interface is easy , simple .The form factor is correctly designed to hold in 1's hand.... Very less people get to experience these amazing products.....If you are planning on getting this , i say just go for it.......you will not regret it... Bottom line -- Excellent built quality , premium experience that not even Android can provide , Does the work without any glitch's and irregularities ..... App store has 275,000 apps .....everyday apple adds nearly 129 apps to its app store....making it still more universally feasible Excellent service from Flipkart.... Thankyou
Everyone out there is comparing the Ipad mini with other tablets in the market especially Nexus 7.Let me tell you one thing first : Do you want to run the Benchmarks in your tab and say hey my tab has 1500 geek score or do you want to feel the performance of your tab. If you observe the gaming in both these tabs (NFS MW) you will never look at nexus 7 again in your life.even though it has 1500 geek when compared to 750 of mini...when it comes to performance the scenario is completely reversed.. In case anyone interested in comparing geekscores, better compare the ANDROID tabs, phones (SAMSUNG,SONY,HTC,LG) but never ever involve APPLE in this aspect because Geek score is the representation of Hardware mostly but where is the perfect sync between SW & HW. All these companies are assembling diff processors,GPUs and saying dual core quad core oct core n Hex core,but remember guys whatever may be the core in those phones or tabs APPLE can handle them with its dual core 1Ghz Processor thats for sure. Most important of all is the hardware degradation: Use nexus 7 for 3-6 months and again run your fav app it will give you no more than 1000 and after 1year 500 after that tab wont be able to run that app either..that wont happen in case of Apple products Use it for 2,3,4 years the same performance,same graphics,same score..Those who cant afford 22k better wait till you can afford 22k, but dont go for cheap tablets,In case you definitely want tablet and cant afford 22k then go for nexus 7.
Cons: 1. A5 dual core 1GHZ processor[Where is A6?] - less than nexus 7 quad core 1.2GHZ tegra 3 which is CHEAPER than this. 2. 512MB RAM- again :( 3. IOS - Limitations [eventhough IOS s great it has many limitations.] 4. pixel density - 162ppi. [Wake up APPLE, where is RETINA?]. 5. Sources says that Ipad Mini 2 s going to be released on the start of 2013[With RETINA DISPLAY]. Beware.. Pros: 1. IOS optimization. You will not feel any lag even-though it has only 512MB RAM. 2. ease of use. 3. Stunning design [Apple is always good in this.] 4. GPU is also good[PowerVR] conclusion: GOOD PRODUCT AVERAGE [BAD for me] SPECS.
The iPad mini does everything the larger iPad does ! The build quality is spectacular and the mini feels as solid as a rock. Compared to its Android competition, the iPad mini has a bigger more usable screen. This is the tablet to buy if you are in the market for one and please do yourself a favor by staying away from the other cheap 7 inch tablets that are available.
Great to see this size of the iPad. In case you were planning to buy a cheep Samsung Galaxy Tab spend a couple more grands and go for this one... This will enlighten your retina like no other tab. Sturdy, apt size and Apple... New I say more...
ASUS did India customers a disservice by launching Nexus 7 tab at double the price of what it is sold in US. Now with IPad Mini at 22K, no one will bother with Nexus 7 offering. Seriously what was ASUS thinking? These companies have to stop taking Indian customers for a ride with their unjustified pricing models.
After waiting for more than a month,apple releases the much awaited apple ipad mini specifications pros 1)handy size-7.9 inches 2)5Mp isight camera-visually stunning 3)1.2 Mp front camera 3)extremely light weight 4)full aluminium body 5) 1GHz dual core processor,this works like a charm 6)light on your pocket for the features cons 1) resolution-not expected from apple thats it...but the resolution is not such a downer and please,now that the mini is out,DONT THINK ABOUT SAMSUNG OR GOOGLE, the tablet doesnt exactly come in one hand..but its still a handy size..the resolution is more than enough...all games run smoothly as expected and the camer is awesome..build quality is mind blowing... enjoy cheers keshav
